West Virginia, session 2026, SB598.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4.  GENERAL SERVICES DIVISION. §5A-4-7. Replacement of statue of Robert C. Byrd with statues of George Washington, Abraham Lincoln, James Madison, and Arthur I. Boreman. (a) The Legislature directs the secretary of the Department of Administration to plan and replace the statue of Robert C. Byrd with a statue of George Washington, Abraham Lincoln, James Madison, and Arthur I. Boreman, one each, placed in a  corner of the rotunda of the Capitol. (b) The General Services Division of the Department of Administration shall use funds from the special "capitol renovation and improvement fund" previously created for funding of the replacement of the Robert C. Byrd statue and creation and placement of the statues of George Washington, Abraham Lincoln, James Madison, and Arthur I. Boreman.